New York, session 2025-2026, S4596.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 296 of the laws of 2023 amending the 2 tax law relating to the imposition of an occupancy tax in the town of 3 DeWitt, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 5 deemed repealed September 1, [2025] 2027. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09209-01-5